Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 4
LAW ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITIES

30-11-401. Short title.

This part 4 shall be known and may be cited as the "Law Enforcement Authority Act of 1969".

Source:

L. 69:

p. 239, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-2.

30-11-402. Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of the general assembly in the enactment of this part 4 to provide an alternative and additional means to provide law enforcement for the citizens of this state, especially those residing in developed or developing unincorporated areas of counties, to combat the rising crime rate therein, and to better assist police and other law enforcement agencies in the prevention of crime and in the detection and apprehension of criminal offenders.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 239, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-1.

L. 71:

p. 346, § 1.

30-11-403. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Area" or "territory" means all areas of land in a county included or proposed to be included in a law enforcement authority, which may consist of all or a portion of the unincorporated area of the county but may not include any single tract or parcel of property containing twenty acres or more without the written consent of the owner thereof, unless such tract or parcel would be entirely within the boundaries of an area.

An "elector" of an authority means a person who, at the designated time or event, is registered to vote in general elections in this state; and
(2) (a) (I) An "elector" of an authority means a person who, at the designated time or event, is registered to vote in general elections in this state; and

Who has been a resident of the authority or the area to be included in the authority for not less than thirty days; or

Who or whose spouse owns taxable real or personal property within the authority or the area to be included within the authority, whether or not said person resides within the authority.

A person who is obligated to pay general taxes under a contract to purchase real property within the authority shall be considered an owner within the meaning of this subsection (2). The ownership of property on which a specific ownership tax is paid pursuant to law shall not qualify a person as an elector. Taxable property shall mean real or personal property subject to general ad valorem taxes.

Registration pursuant to the general election laws or any other laws shall not be required.

"Law enforcement authority", referred to in this part 4 as an "authority", means a taxing unit which may be created by a county in this state for the purpose of providing additional law enforcement by the county sheriff to the residents of the developed or developing unincorporated area of the county.

"Publication", when no manner of publication is specified, means publication once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the authority. It shall not be necessary that publication be made on the same day of the week in each of the three consecutive weeks, but not less than fourteen days, excluding the day of first publication, shall intervene between the day of the first publication and the day of the last publication, and publication shall be complete on the day of the last publication.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 239, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-3.

L. 70:

p. 144, § 17.

L. 71:

pp. 337, 346, 348, §§ 4, 2, 3, 9.

L. 96:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1767, § 59, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

30-11-404. Organization of authority.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state may by resolution create an authority pursuant to the provisions of this part 4, which authority shall be a political subdivision of this state.

No resolution creating an authority under this part 4 shall be adopted by a board of county commissioners unless prior notice of such action, including the date, time, and place of meeting of said board, shall be made by publication, and an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel shall be afforded to persons desiring to appear.

The resolution creating such an authority shall contain the following:

The name of the proposed district, which shall include the name of the county and the words "law enforcement authority";

A general description of the territory included in the authority, with such certainty to enable a property owner to determine whether or not his property is within the authority; and

Where applicable, the specific powers and duties of the authority, as provided in this part 4, but if the authority is authorized to exercise all such powers and duties under this part 4, only a general statement to this effect need be included.

The resolution creating any such authority shall not take effect until thirty days following the canvass of votes cast at the election conducted pursuant to section 30-11-405.

On the effective date of such resolution, the board of county commissioners shall, ex officio, constitute the governing board of the authority and shall exercise the powers and duties prescribed in this part 4 and in the resolution.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 240, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-4.

L. 71:

p. 347, § 4.

30-11-405. Election.

The board of county commissioners shall call a special election in the area proposed to be included in the authority, as described in the resolution, which election shall be held not less than thirty nor more than forty-five days after adoption of the resolution by the board of county commissioners.

No authority shall be created unless the proposition to create such authority shall first be submitted to and approved by the electors of the authority.

Notice of the election shall be by publication and shall contain the question to be submitted, the date of the election, the times that the polls shall be open, and the place of each polling place. Designation of election precincts and polling places and election contests shall be pursuant to the provisions of part 8 of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S.

Said election shall otherwise be conducted, insofar as practicable, as are general elections. Election judges shall be appointed and compensated by the board of county commissioners, and their powers and duties shall be defined and exercised pursuant to the comparable provisions of law governing general elections, except that they shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation. All costs of such election shall be paid out of the county general fund.

If a majority of those electors of the authority voting at said election have voted in favor of such proposition, said authority shall be approved and the resolution creating the same shall become effective as provided in section 30-11-404.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 240, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-5.

L. 70:

p. 145, § 18.

L. 71:

pp. 337, 347, 348, §§ 5, 7, 5, 9.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 1612, § 10, effective June 19.

30-11-406. Powers of law enforcement authority.

Each law enforcement authority formed pursuant to this part 4 has the following powers, except as otherwise limited by the resolution creating the same:

To have perpetual existence;

To sue and be sued and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

To enter into contracts and agreements with the sheriff of the county in which the authority is located to provide law enforcement services for the authority, except as otherwise provided in this part 4;

To employ such administrative, clerical, and professional employees as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the authority;

To levy a tax not to exceed five mills for the 1982 property tax year or seven mills for the 1983 property tax year and each property tax year thereafter on the taxable property within the area of the authority, for the payment of the operating expenses of the authority. In any case in which an authority proposes to impose a mill levy which is the maximum mill levy allowable under this paragraph (e) or which is in excess of the certified mill levy computed pursuant to section 30-11-406.5, such authority shall follow the procedure set forth in section 30-11-406.5.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 241, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-6.

L. 81:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1399, § 13, effective June 19.

30-11-406.5. Procedure for levying property tax - public disclosure - county assessor's duties.

No later than August 25 of each year, each county assessor shall certify to each authority within the assessor's county the total valuation for assessment of all taxable property located within the territorial limits of the authority and the mill levy that when applied to such valuation for assessment, exclusive of the increased valuation for assessment attributable to annexation or inclusion of additional land, the improvements thereon, and personal property connected therewith within the authority for the preceding year, or attributable to new construction and personal property connected therewith within the authority for the preceding year, or attributable to increased volume of production for the preceding year by a producing mine if said mine is wholly or partially within the authority and if such increase in volume of production causes an increase in the level of services provided by the authority, or attributable to previously legally exempt federal property that becomes taxable if such property causes an increase in the level of services provided by the authority, will raise the same property tax revenue as was raised the previous year.

Any authority which proposes to impose a mill levy in excess of the mill levy for the previous year shall submit such proposal at an election in accordance with section 20 of article X of the state constitution and title 1, C.R.S.

to (6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1188, § 84, effective July 1, 1994.)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1399, § 14, effective June 19.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 458, § 3, effective March 17.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 2073, § 3, effective October 13.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1188, § 3, effective March 12.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1188, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 17, § 2, effective February 22.

30-11-407. Short-term loans for new authorities.

In order to provide funds for a new authority to operate prior to the receipt of revenues from property taxes, an authority may contract with any person, corporation, association, or company for a short-term loan, not to exceed the amount necessary for such operation, and such loan shall be fully paid within twelve months; but subsequent short-term loans may be made in each budget year in smaller amounts and shall be paid within six months. Such subsequent loans shall be scheduled to liquidate the accumulated debt fully in a period not to exceed ten years after the date of the first loan. Interest paid on such loans shall be exempt from taxation by the state or any political subdivision thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 241, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-7.

30-11-408. Detachment - dissolution.

Upon the effective date of the annexation to any city, town, or city and county, or the incorporation of any territory included in an authority, upon the certification thereof by the clerk of such municipality, the territory so annexed or incorporated shall be detached from such authority as of the effective date thereof, if such be January 1 of any year; otherwise, such detachment shall take effect on the following January 1, for purposes of general property taxation. Property so detached shall not thereafter be liable for any portion of the outstanding indebtedness of the authority.

Upon the annexation or incorporation of fifty percent or more of the area of the territory included in any authority, or upon petition by ten percent of the electors and the approval of a majority of the electors of the authority voting at a special election called for that purpose, pursuant to the applicable provisions of section 30-11-405, any authority formed under this part 4 shall be dissolved effective the following January 1, except that if any indebtedness of the authority is unpaid and outstanding, the authority shall continue in existence for taxation purposes only until all obligations of the authority are paid.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 241, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-8.

L. 70:

p. 146, § 19.

L. 71:

pp. 337, 347, §§ 6, 6.

30-11-409. Payments to sheriff.

Moneys paid to any sheriff for services pursuant to the provisions of this part 4 shall be expended by the sheriff only for law enforcement purposes, including administration and capital expenditures, pursuant to agreements entered into as authorized by this part 4.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 241, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-9.

30-11-410. Power to contract for provision of law enforcement services.

The governing body of a municipality and the board of county commissioners may contract for the purpose of providing law enforcement, including enforcement of municipal ordinances, by the sheriff within the boundaries of the municipality.

The law enforcement authority and the sheriff may contract with other law enforcement agencies or with municipalities for the provision of law enforcement services within the unincorporated areas of the county.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 347, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-10.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1270, § 3, effective April 23.

30-11-411. Inclusion of land.

An additional area may be included in a law enforcement authority, upon petition of all electors and landowners in such area, by resolution of the board of county commissioners or by such resolution and a vote of a majority of electors of such area in the same manner as provided for the organization of a law enforcement authority.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 348, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-27-11.